Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 37 Active Militia

37.010.
Governor to organize Active Militia; may disband or reorganize it. [Repealed.]

37.020.
Active Militia a division of the Department of Military Affairs. [Repealed.]

37.030.
Organization; administration; equipment; drill. [Repealed.]

37.040.
Executive Council. [Repealed.]

37.050.
Enlistments; qualifications; discharge; term. [Repealed.]

37.060.
Oaths of Active Militia; forms. [Repealed.]

37.070.
Commanding officer, visits of instruction and inspection. [Repealed.]

37.080.
Armories; drill halls; rifle ranges. [Repealed.]

37.090.
Expenses of Active Militia; how paid. [Repealed.]

37.100.
Per diem allowed officers. [Repealed.]

37.110.
Officers and men in active service are peace officers. [Repealed.]

37.120.
Fees; rewards. [Repealed.]

37.130.
Not liable for acts done in pursuance of duty. [Repealed.]

37.140.
Active service, how and when Active and Reserve Militia ordered into. [Repealed.]

37.150.
Exemptions from military service. [Repealed.]

37.160.
Enrollment of Reserve Militia; county clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

37.170.
Kentucky State Defense Force — Organization — Reorganization.

The Governor is hereby authorized to enlist, organize, maintain, equip, discipline and pay when called into active field service a volunteer state defense force other than the National Guard, which shall constitute the active militia and shall be known as the Kentucky State Defense Force, which shall consist of able-bodied citizens who are residents of the State of Kentucky between the ages of eighteen (18) and sixty-four (64) who are not active members of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

Whenever the President of the United States shall call any part of the National Guard of this state into active federal service, the Governor is hereby authorized to organize the Kentucky State Defense Force under such regulations as may be promulgated by the Governor or adjutant general.

The Governor shall have the power to alter, divide, annex, disband or reorganize any organization of the Kentucky State Defense Force whenever in his judgment the efficiency of the state forces will thereby be increased, and he shall have power to change the organization so as to conform to the regulations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of the United States for the organization of the National Guard or militia.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, §§ 1, 4, 8; 1962, ch. 48, § 3; 1974, ch. 108, § 10; 1974, ch. 386, § 9; 1984, ch. 414, § 47, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Code of regulations for active militia, KRS

36.170

.

Expense of maintaining active militia, KRS

36.220

.

National Guard, KRS Ch. 38.

Organization of militia to conform to United States army regulations, Const., § 221.

Persons who constitute militia, exemptions from military service, Const., §§ 219, 220.

ALR

Minors, enlistment or mustering of 137 A.L.R. 1467; 147 A.L.R. 1311; 151 A.L.R. 1455; 153 A.L.R. 1420; 155 A.L.R. 1451; 157 A.L.R. 1449.

37.180.
Governor is commander in chief — Adjutant general is executive officer.

The Governor shall be commander in chief of the Kentucky active militia, and the adjutant general shall be the executive officer and shall be responsible to the Governor for the proper functioning of the Kentucky active militia, and he is hereby authorized and empowered to take necessary action to perfect and maintain an efficient organization for the purposes herein set out. He shall have charge of all matters of administration and organization, which shall be in all respects, insofar as necessary and applicable, the same as that of the National Guard.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Adjutant general, powers and duties of, KRS

36.040

.

Governor, commander in chief of militia, Const., § 75.

37.190.
Executive council.
[Repealed.]

37.200.
Officers and personnel — Administration — Equipment — Housing — Enlistment and discharge of men.

The Governor of Kentucky is hereby authorized to appoint and commission the necessary officers for the Kentucky active militia. The adjutant general of the state with the approval of the Governor shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the enlistment, organization, administration, pay, equipment, discipline and discharge of the personnel of the Kentucky active militia; obtain by requisition or purchase from the Secretary of Defense such necessary arms and equipment as may be secured from the Department of Defense, or procure from some other source the necessary arms and equipment to maintain and equip the Kentucky active militia; and provide the necessary space for the housing of property and for the purpose of drills and instruction.

All officers shall be appointed and commissioned by the Governor. All men shall be enlisted by the unit commanders and may be discharged upon order of the Governor for the same reasons as men are discharged from the National Guard, when such discharge is requested in writing by the unit commanders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, §§ 5, 6; 1962, ch. 48, § 4.

37.210.
Oaths of officers and men.

All officers and enlisted men of the Kentucky active militia shall take an oath similar to that required to be taken by commissioned officers and enlisted men of the National Guard. Said oath when duly subscribed to shall be filed with and preserved by the adjutant general of Kentucky. The oath shall be administered to all officers by any person authorized to administer an oath. The commanding officers of the units are authorized and empowered to administer the oath to all enlisted men in their units.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 7.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Oaths of National Guard members, KRS

38.070

,

38.090

.

ALR

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to militiamen. 18 A.L.R.2d 268.

37.220.
Drill — Parades — Ceremonies — Privileges.

Companies and other units of the Kentucky active militia are hereby authorized to drill, to parade and to have all other ceremonies, privileges and rights in regard to such matters, within the state, as is authorized by law for the National Guard.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 11.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Parade with arms, who may, KRS

38.440

.

37.230.
Visits of inspection.

Commanding and staff officers of organizations and units are hereby authorized to make such visits of instruction and inspection, when authorized by the adjutant general to do so, as in his discretion may be necessary. When making said visits they may be compensated as provided in KRS

36.140

and

38.205

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 15; 1962, ch. 48, § 5; 1970, ch. 92, § 9.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Inspection of military property by adjutant general, KRS

36.200

.

37.240.
Active service — How and when ordered into — Direction — Powers.

The Governor is hereby authorized to call and to assign any part of the Kentucky active militia to active service for the purpose of resisting invasion, suppressing rebellions, insurrections, riots, or threats thereof; to suppress any active, unlawful, or threatened violence to persons or property in this state; to authorize the arrest of all persons engaged in aiding or abetting therein; to investigate any acts of treason, sabotage, or attempted sabotage and to cause the arrest of such persons engaged therein for aiding and abetting; to protect life and property in the event of any emergency or disaster. The Governor may by his order prescribe the duty to be performed by the troops thus called into active field service. The Governor may direct the commanding officer of such military forces thus ordered into service to report to any of the following named civil officers of the judicial circuit, county, city, or town: Circuit Judge, sheriff, county judge/executive, or mayor; and such civil officers may direct the specific object to be accomplished by such military force, but the tactical direction and disposition of the troops and the particular means to be employed to accomplish the object shall be left solely to the officers of the Kentucky active militia. Troops shall not be relieved from active field service except by order of the Governor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 9; 1976, ch. 62, § 48.

37.250.
Right to carry arms.

Officers and enlisted men of the Kentucky active militia when ordered on active duty as prescribed herein shall have the right to carry arms. All officers and enlisted men shall have the right to carry arms at any drill or ceremony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 18.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note, Carrying a Concealed Weapon — Nature of the Offense in Kentucky, 38 Ky. L.J. 275 (1949-1950).

37.260.
Not liable for acts done in pursuance of duty.

Officers and enlisted men of the Kentucky active militia ordered into active service by proper authority shall not be liable civilly or criminally for any act or acts legally done in the pursuance of their duty in such service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, § 14.

37.265.
Application of code of military justice.

Officers and enlisted men of the Kentucky active militia shall be subject to the code of military justice as set forth in KRS Chapter 35.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 48, § 1.

37.270.
Pay for active field service — Travel expense.

Officers and enlisted men, when employed in active state service as defined in subsection (4) of KRS

38.010

, beginning with the day they assemble at their armories or other designated place until the day they return thereto and have been properly relieved, inclusive, fractional parts of a day counting as a full day, shall receive pay at the rates provided for in KRS

38.205

and in addition thereto actual and necessary cost of transportation, when transportation is not furnished in kind.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 94, § 9; 1970, ch. 92, § 10.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Maintenance of active militia, how paid, KRS

36.220

.

37.280.
Pay and expenses for member injured in course of duty — Claim — Examination. [Repealed.]

37.285.
Workers’ compensation for members on active state service.

The Department of Military Affairs shall accept the provisions of KRS Chapter 342 for the benefit of members of the Kentucky active militia while such members are on active state service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 48, § 2; 1974, ch. 108, § 11.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

National Guard, acceptance of Workers’ Compensation Law, KRS

38.235

.

37.290.
Funeral expenses. [Repealed.]

37.300.
Preparation and return of body for burial — Payment of medical and funeral expenses. [Repealed.]

37.310.
Legal representation in civil or criminal action arising out of act done in course of duty.

If any member of the active militia, when on duty or assembled therefor under competent authority or lawful order, shall do any act in the discharge of his duty, the doing of which causes him to be proceeded against by civil court action, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the member of the active militia in any civil proceedings so begun. If, under the same conditions, a member of the active militia is proceeded against in a criminal action, the adjutant general may, with the approval of the Governor, appoint for said member of the active militia, legal counsel, who shall represent said member in any criminal proceedings so begun. The compensation paid the legal counsel shall be fixed by the adjutant general, with the written approval of the Governor, and upon proper certification shall be paid from the appropriation for the Department of Military Affairs as other claims against that department are paid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 10, § 4.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Attorneys for state departments and agencies, employment of, KRS

12.210

.

National Guard, legal representation, KRS

38.240

.

37.990.
Penalty.

Any person, other than a member of the Kentucky active militia, who shall wear any uniform or insignia or badge duly authorized as a designation of an officer or an enlisted man of the Kentucky active militia, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 4, §§ 12, 19; 1944, ch. 173, § 5; 1974, ch. 108, § 12, effective June 21, 1974.